Illinois, session 104th, HB3591.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois African-American Family Commission 5Act is amended by changing Sections 1, 5, 10, 15, 20, 25, 30, 6and 35 and by adding Section 23 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 3903/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Illinois 9African American African-American Family Commission Act.10(Source: P.A. 93-867, eff. 8-5-04.) 11    (20 ILCS 3903/5)12    Sec. 5. Legislative findings. It is the policy of this 13State to promote family preservation and to preserve and 14strengthen families.15    (a) Over 12 million people live in Illinois. African 16Americans African-Americans represent 15% of the population 17and 26% of the residents living in Cook County. Despite some 18progress over the last few decades, African Americans 19African-Americans in Illinois continue to lag behind other 20racial groups relative to indicators of well-being in 21education, employment, income, and health. According to the 222000 U.S. Census, just 26% of the African American   HB3591- 2 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1African-American population over 25 years of age in Illinois 2completed their high school education; 6% held an associate's 3degree; less than 10% (9%) held a bachelor's degree; less than 45% (3%) held a master's degree; and less than one percent held 5either a professional (.8%) or doctoral (.4%) degree. 6    These levels of education attainment reflect more 7fundamental problems with retaining African Americans 8African-Americans in school. The Illinois State Board of 9Education reported that for the 2001-2002 school year, 36,373, 10or 6%, of students enrolled in public high schools dropped 11out. Thirty-nine percent of these students were African 12Americans African-Americans; 38% were White; 21% were 13Hispanic; and 2% were classified as Other. 14    Although African Americans African-Americans make up 18% 15of the high school population, they are disproportionately 16represented in the number of students who are suspended and 17expelled. In the 2001-2002 school year, 29,068 students were 18suspended from school. Forty-seven percent were White, 37% 19were African American African-American, 14% were Hispanic, and 201% were classified as Other. In regards to expulsions 21Statewide, the total number of high school students expelled 22was 1,651. Forty-three percent were African American 23African-American, 41% were White, 14% were Hispanic, and 2% 24were classified as Other. Within Chicago public schools, 448 25students were expelled. Seventy-seven of these students were 26African American African-American; 27% were White; 14% were   HB3591- 3 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Hispanic; and 4% were classified as Other. The fact that 2African Americans African-Americans are more likely to be 3suspended or expelled from school also contributes to the high 4dropout rate among African American African-American high 5school students. 6    In addition to educational challenges, African Americans 7African-Americans face challenges in the areas of employment 8and income. In the year 2000, the unemployment rate for 9African Americans African-Americans age 16 years or older was 1015% compared to only 6% for the total Illinois population. 11Moreover, the median household income of African Americans 12African-Americans in Illinois was $31,699 compared to $46,590 13for the total Illinois population, and the percentage of 14African American African-American families below the poverty 15level in Illinois was 26% in 1999 compared to 10.7% for the 16total Illinois population in that same year. 17    Indicators of child welfare and criminal justice reveal 18still more challenges that African American African-American 19families face in Illinois. In 2000, African American 20African-American children represented 18% of children 18 years 21of age and under, but comprised 73% of children in substitute 22care. African Americans African-Americans are also 23overrepresented in the criminal justice population. Of the 24total Illinois adult inmate population in the year 2000, 65% 25were African American African-American. During this same time 26period, African American African-American youth represented   HB3591- 4 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b158% of the juvenile inmate population in Illinois. 2    While the leading causes of death among African Americans 3African-Americans are the same as those for the general 4population in Illinois, African Americans African-Americans 5have a higher rate of death per 100,000 residents. The rate of 6overall deaths per 100,000 residents among African Americans 7African-Americans in the year 2000 was 1,181; 847 for Whites; 8and 411 for those classified as Other. The rate of 9cancer-related deaths per 100,000 residents by racial or 10ethnic groups in 2000 was: 278 African Americans 11African-Americans; 206 Whites; and 110 of those classified as 12Other. The rate of diabetes-related deaths per 100,000 13residents among African Americans African-Americans in 2000 14was 41 compared to 23 for Whites and 13 for those classified as 15Other. The rate of deaths per 100,000 residents by heart 16disease among African Americans African-Americans in 2000 was 17352 compared to 257 for Whites and 120 for those classified as 18Other. The rate of deaths per 100,000 residents by stroke 19among African Americans African-Americans in 2000 was 75; 60 20for Whites; and 35 for those classified as Other. 21    African Americans African-Americans had higher rates of 22smoking and obesity than other racial groups in Illinois in 232001. African Americans African-Americans accounted for more 24of the new adult/adolescent AIDS cases, cumulative 25adult/adolescent AIDS cases, and number of people living with 26AIDS than other racial groups in Illinois in the year 2002.   HB3591- 5 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Still, 23% of uninsured persons in Illinois are African 2American African-American. 3    (b) The Illinois African American African-American Family 4Commission continues to be an essential key to promoting the 5preservation and strengthening of families. As of January 1, 62015 (the effective date of Public Act 98-693), just under 13 7million people live in Illinois. African Americans 8African-Americans represent 15% of the population and 25% of 9the residents living in Cook County. Despite some progress 10over the last few decades, African Americans African-Americans 11in Illinois continue to lag behind other racial groups 12relative to indicators of well-being in education, employment, 13income, and health. According to the 2010 federal decennial 14census: just 28% of the African American African-American 15population over 25 years of age in Illinois completed their 16high school education; 36% had some college or an associate's 17degree; less than 12% held a bachelor's degree; less than 8% 18held either a graduate or professional degree.19    These levels of education attainment reflect more 20fundamental problems with retaining African Americans 21African-Americans in school. The State Board of Education 22reported that for the 2010-2011 school year, 18,210, or 2.77%, 23of students enrolled in public high schools dropped out. 39.3% 24of these students were African Americans African-Americans; 2532.6% were White; 24.2% were Hispanic; and 2% were classified 26as Other.  HB3591- 6 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    Although African Americans African-Americans make up 20% 2of the high school population, they are disproportionately 3represented in the number of students who are suspended and 4expelled. In the 2011-2012 school year, 29,928 students were 5suspended from school. 36% were White, 34% were African 6American African-American, 26% were Hispanic, and 4% were 7classified as Other. With regard to expulsions statewide, the 8total number of high school students expelled was 982. 37% 9were African American African-American, 41% were White, 21% 10were Hispanic, and 2% were classified as Other. Within Chicago 11public schools, 294 students were expelled. 80% of these 12students were African American African-American; none were 13White; 17% were Hispanic; and 3% were classified as Other. The 14fact that African Americans African-Americans are more likely 15to be suspended or expelled from school also contributes to 16the high dropout rate among African American African-American 17high school students.18    In addition to educational challenges, African Americans 19African-Americans face challenges in the areas of employment 20and income. In the year 2010, the unemployment rate for 21African Americans African-Americans age 16 years or older was 2216% compared to only 9% for the total Illinois population. 23Moreover, the median household income of African Americans 24African-Americans in Illinois was $34,874 compared to $60,433 25for the total Illinois population, and the percentage of 26African American African-American families below the poverty   HB3591- 7 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1level in Illinois was 32% in 2012 compared to 15% for the total 2Illinois population in that same year.3    Indicators of child welfare and criminal justice reveal 4still more challenges that African American African-American 5families face in Illinois. In 2010, African American 6African-American children represented 14% of children 18 years 7of age and under, but comprised 56% of children in substitute 8care. African Americans African-Americans are also 9overrepresented in the criminal justice population. Of the 10total Illinois adult inmate population in the year 2012, 57% 11were African American African-American. During this same time 12period, African American African-American youth represented 1366% of the juvenile inmate population in Illinois.14    While the leading causes of death among African Americans 15African-Americans are the same as those for the general 16population in Illinois, African Americans African-Americans 17have a higher rate of death per 100,000 residents. The rate of 18overall deaths per 100,000 residents among African Americans 19African-Americans in the year 2010 was 898; 741 for Whites; 20and 458 for those classified as Other. The rate of 21cancer-related deaths per 100,000 residents by racial or 22ethnic groups in 2010 was 216 for African Americans 23African-Americans; 179 for Whites; and 124 for those 24classified as Other. The rate of diabetes-related deaths per 25100,000 residents among African Americans African-Americans in 262010 was 114 compared to 66 for Whites and 75 for those   HB3591- 8 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1classified as Other. The rate of deaths per 100,000 residents 2by heart disease among African Americans African-Americans in 32010 was 232 compared to 179 for Whites and 121 for those 4classified as Other. The rate of deaths per 100,000 residents 5by stroke among African Americans African-Americans in 2010 6was 108; 73 for Whites; and 56 for those classified as Other.7    African Americans African-Americans had higher rates of 8smoking and obesity than other racial groups in Illinois in 92013. African Americans African-Americans accounted for more 10of the new adult/adolescent AIDS cases, cumulative 11adult/adolescent AIDS cases, and number of people living with 12AIDS than other racial groups in Illinois in the year 2013. 13Still, 24% of uninsured persons in Illinois are African 14American African-American. 15    (c) These huge disparities in education, employment, 16income, child welfare, criminal justice, and health 17demonstrate the tremendous challenges facing the African 18American African-American family in Illinois. These challenges 19are severe. There is a need for government, child and family 20advocates, and other key stakeholders to create and implement 21public policies to address the health and social crises facing 22African American African-American families. The development of 23given solutions clearly transcends any one State agency and 24requires a coordinated effort. The Illinois African American 25African-American Family Commission shall assist State agencies 26with this task.   HB3591- 9 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    The African American African-American Family Commission 2was created in October 1994 by Executive Order to assist the 3Illinois Department of Children and Family Services in 4developing and implementing programs and public policies that 5affect the State's child welfare system. The Commission has a 6proven track record of bringing State agencies, community 7providers, and consumers together to address child welfare 8issues. The ability of the Commission to address the 9above-mentioned health issues, community factors, and the 10personal well-being of African American African-American 11families and children has been limited due to the Executive 12Order's focus on child welfare. It is apparent that broader 13issues of health, mental health, criminal justice, education, 14and economic development also directly affect the health and 15well-being of African American African-American families and 16children. Accordingly, the role of the Illinois African 17American African-American Family Commission is hereby expanded 18to encompass working relationships with every department, 19agency, and commission within State government if any of its 20activities impact African American African-American children 21and families. The focus of the Commission is hereby 22restructured and shall exist by legislative mandate to engage 23State agencies in its efforts to preserve and strengthen 24African American African-American families. 25(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   HB3591- 10 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    (20 ILCS 3903/10)2    Sec. 10. Illinois African American African-American Family 3Commission established. The African-American Family Commission 4shall be renamed and established as the Illinois 5African-American Family Commission and, after the effective 6date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 7renamed the Illinois African American Family Commission. 8(Source: P.A. 93-867, eff. 8-5-04.) 9    (20 ILCS 3903/15)10    Sec. 15. Purpose and objectives. The purpose of the 11Illinois African American Family Commission is to be an 12independent voice and represent the priorities of the African 13American community and advocate for policies, programs, and 14services that promote greater equity and inclusion in State 15government. The Illinois African American Family Commission 16works directly with the Governor, the General Assembly, 17constitutional officers, and State agencies to develop new and 18improve existing policies, services, programs, and 19opportunities for African American families. The Illinois 20African American Family Commission shall: 21        (1) advocate for State policies, programs, and 22    services that improve equity, inclusion, and the quality 23    of life of African Americans;24        (2) develop and advance recommendations to the 25    Governor, the General Assembly, State courts, and other   HB3591- 11 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    State entities and constitutional officers to reduce 2    disparities and disproportionality experienced by African 3    Americans;4        (3) identify priorities, goals, and objectives 5    reflecting an African American policy agenda to guide the 6    Commission's work;7        (4) monitor the impact of and shape legislation, 8    policies, programs, and practices to ensure that they are 9    responsive to African Americans in Illinois;10        (5) collaborate with the Governor's Office, the 11    General Assembly, constitutional officers, State courts, 12    State agencies, and boards and commissions in developing 13    new and shaping existing programs, services, policies, and 14    initiatives to expand and enhance the social and economic 15    well-being of African American children and families;16        (6) facilitate the participation and representation of 17    African Americans in the development, implementation, and 18    planning of policies, programs, and services;19        (7) engage in and promote research efforts concerning 20    African Americans that can inform policies, programs, and 21    services to ensure greater equity and accountability;22        (8) create and approve the annual budget and have sole 23    authority over expenditures in line with the Illinois 24    Procurement Code and the rules adopted under that Code;25        (9) hire an executive director to administer 26    operations;  HB3591- 12 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (10) make or enter into contracts with third parties 2    as necessary and convenient for the exercise of its powers 3    and duties, including defining personnel needs and hiring 4    staff as required to perform its duties under this Act; 5    all procurement must follow State policy and procedures;6        (11) co-convene quarterly roundtable meetings with the 7    Illinois Latino Family Commission and the Asian American 8    Family Commission to identify opportunities for 9    collaboration and alignment;10        (12) hold at least 2 public hearings annually to 11    assist in the development of recommendations for the 12    Governor, the General Assembly, State courts, and other 13    State entities and constitutional officers;14        (13) apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 15    allocate, disburse, and spend grants funds that are made 16    available to the Commission; and 17        (14) exercise such other powers as are necessary or 18    incidental to the administration of this Act or the 19    performance of duties under this Act.20The purpose of the Illinois African-American Family Commission 21is to advise the Governor and General Assembly, as well as work 22directly with State agencies, to improve and expand existing 23policies, services, programs, and opportunities for 24African-American families. The Illinois African-American 25Family Commission shall guide the efforts of and collaborate 26with State agencies, including: the Department on Aging, the   HB3591- 13 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Department of 3Corrections, the Department of Human Services, the Department 4of Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of Public 5Health, the Department of Transportation, the Department of 6Employment Security, and others. This shall be achieved 7primarily by: 8        (1) monitoring and commenting on existing and proposed 9    legislation and programs designed to address the needs of 10    African-Americans in Illinois; 11        (2) assisting State agencies in developing programs, 12    services, public policies, and research strategies that 13    will expand and enhance the social and economic well-being 14    of African-American children and families; 15        (3) facilitating the participation of and 16    representation of African-Americans in the development, 17    implementation, and planning of policies, programs, and 18    services; and 19        (4) promoting research efforts to document the impact 20    of policies and programs on African-American families. 21    The work of the Illinois African-American Family 22Commission shall include the use of existing reports, research 23and planning efforts, procedures, and programs. 24(Source: P.A. 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 25    (20 ILCS 3903/20)  HB3591- 14 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    Sec. 20. Appointment; terms. The Illinois African American 2African-American Family Commission shall be comprised of 15 3members appointed under this Section.4    As soon as practical after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, but not later 6than July 1, 2025, the Governor, the President of the Senate, 7the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 8Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 9Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 10Commission. Commission members shall elect the chairperson or 11chairpersons by a majority vote of the appointed members, and 12the chairperson or chairpersons shall each serve for a 2-year 13term. The terms of any commissioners serving on the effective 14date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 15terminated.16    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 17the following initial appointments: each appointing authority 18shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year term and one member to 19a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 20contrary, members may be reappointed to a 3-year term. 21    Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years 22and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 23vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 24filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 25balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 26until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall   HB3591- 15 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting 2from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 3compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 4expenses. 5    Appointing authorities shall ensure, to the maximum extent 6practicable, that the Commission is diverse with respect to 7age, gender, and geography to ensure the needs of African 8American families and children through the State are met. 9Members shall be persons with recognized ability and 10experience in one or more of the following areas: education, 11business, social services, human services, community 12development, labor, economic policy, criminal justice, 13immigration, or health care. 14    For those seats on the Commission with terms that expire 15in 2015, and for subsequent appointments to those seats, the 16Governor, the President of the Senate, the Minority Leader of 17the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and 18the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each 19appoint one member to the Commission.20    For those seats on the Commission with terms that expire 21in 2016, and for subsequent appointments to those seats, the 22Governor, the President of the Senate, the Minority Leader of 23the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and 24the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each 25appoint one member to the Commission.26    For those seats on the Commission with terms that expire   HB3591- 16 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1in 2017, and for subsequent appointments to those seats, the 2Governor shall appoint 5 members to the Commission. 3    Each member shall have a working knowledge of human 4services, community development, and economic public policies 5in Illinois. The Governor shall appoint the chairperson or 6chairpersons.7    The members shall reflect regional representation to 8ensure that the needs of African-American families and 9children throughout the State of Illinois are met. The members 10shall be selected from a variety of disciplines. They shall be 11representative of a partnership and collaborative effort 12between public and private agencies, the business sector, and 13community-based human services organizations. 14    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 15initial appointments. One-third of initially appointed 16members, as determined by lot, shall be appointed to 1-year 17terms; 1/3 shall be appointed to 2-year terms; and 1/3 shall be 18appointed to 3-year terms, so that the terms are staggered. 19Members will serve without compensation, but shall be 20reimbursed for Commission-related expenses. 21    The Department on Aging, the Department of Children and 22Family Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic 23Opportunity, the Department of Corrections, the Department of 24Human Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family 25Services, the Department of Public Health, the State Board of 26Education, the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois   HB3591- 17 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Community College Board, the Department of Human Rights, the 2Capital Development Board, the Department of Labor, and the 3Department of Transportation shall each appoint a liaison to 4serve ex-officio on the Commission. The Office of the 5Governor, in cooperation with the State agencies appointing 6liaisons to the Commission under this Section, shall provide 7administrative support to the Commission. 8(Source: P.A. 98-693, eff. 1-1-15.) 9    (20 ILCS 3903/23 new)10    Sec. 23. Organizational meeting. The Commission shall hold 11its organizational meeting within 60 days after at least 50% 12of the members who are to be appointed under Section 20 have 13been appointed. 14    (20 ILCS 3903/25)15    Sec. 25. Funding. The Lieutenant Governor's Office may 16receive funding through appropriations made available for use 17on behalf of the Illinois African American Family Commission. 18The Lieutenant Governor's Office shall expend funds set aside 19for the Commission at the Commission's direction. The 20African-American Family Commission may receive funding through 21appropriations available for its purposes made to the 22Department on Aging, the Department of Children and Family 23Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 24the Department of Corrections, the Department of Human   HB3591- 18 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 2the Department of Public Health, the State Board of Education, 3the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community College 4Board, the Department of Human Rights, the Capital Development 5Board, the Department of Labor, and the Department of 6Transportation. The Commission may also receive and expend 7funding from federal and private sources, including gifts, 8donations, and private grants. 9(Source: P.A. 98-693, eff. 1-1-15.) 10    (20 ILCS 3903/30)11    Sec. 30. Reporting. By January 1 of each year, the 12Illinois African American Family Commission shall submit to 13the Governor and the General Assembly a report detailing 14progress toward the goals and objectives of the Commission. 15The report shall detail, at a minimum, the Commission's work 16with agencies under the Governor, the Commission's current and 17ongoing research projects, and any legislative activity 18undertaken by the Commission. The Illinois African-American 19Family Commission shall annually report to the Governor, the 20General Assembly, and the Commission on Equity and Inclusion 21on the Commission's progress toward its goals and objectives. 22(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.) 23    (20 ILCS 3903/35)24    Sec. 35. Administrative support. Oversight.   HB3591- 19 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 2Lieutenant Governor's Office shall, at the request of the 3Illinois African American Family Commission, provide 4administrative and technical support to assist the Commission 5in carrying out its duties. Administrative and technical 6support includes providing guidance on State rules and 7regulations pertaining to contracts, expenditures, and 8payments to ensure compliance with State procurement policies 9and processes. The Lieutenant Governor's Office shall provide 10assistance to the Illinois African American Family Commission 11as requested, including access to office space, technology, 12and other supports necessary for effective operations. 13Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 14Commission on Equity and Inclusion established under the 15Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act shall have general 16oversight of the operations of the Illinois African-American 17Family Commission.18(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.) 19    Section 15. The Asian American Family Commission Act is 20amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 20, and 25 and by 21adding Section 12 as follows: 22    (20 ILCS 3916/5)23    Sec. 5. Purpose and objectives. The purpose of the Asian 24American Family Commission is to be an independent voice and   HB3591- 20 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1represent the priorities of the Asian American community and 2advocate for policies, programs, and services that promote 3greater equity and inclusion in State government. The Asian 4American Family Commission works directly with the Governor, 5the General Assembly, constitutional officers, and State 6agencies to develop new and improve existing policies, 7services, programs, and opportunities for Asian American 8families. The Asian American Family Commission shall: 9        (1) advocate for State policies, programs, and 10    services that improve equity, inclusion, and the quality 11    of life of Asian Americans;12        (2) develop and advance recommendations to the 13    Governor, the General Assembly, State courts, and other 14    State entities and constitutional officers to reduce 15    disparities and disproportionality experienced by Asian 16    Americans;17        (3) identify priorities, goals, and objectives 18    reflecting an Asian American policy agenda to guide the 19    Commission's work;20        (4) monitor the impact of and shape legislation, 21    policies, programs, and practices to ensure that they are 22    responsive to Asian Americans in Illinois;23        (5) collaborate with the Governor's Office, the 24    General Assembly, constitutional officers, State courts, 25    State agencies, and boards and commissions in developing 26    new and shaping existing programs, services, policies, and   HB3591- 21 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    initiatives to expand and enhance the social and economic 2    well-being of Asian American children and families;3        (6) facilitate the participation and representation of 4    Asian Americans in the development, implementation, and 5    planning of policies, programs, and services;6        (7) engage in and promote research efforts concerning 7    Asian Americans that can inform policies, programs, and 8    services to ensure greater equity and accountability;9        (8) create and approve the annual budget and have sole 10    authority over expenditures in line with the Illinois 11    Procurement Code and the rules adopted under that Code;12        (9) hire an executive director to administer 13    operations;14        (10) make or enter into contracts with third parties 15    as necessary and convenient for the exercise of its powers 16    and duties, including defining personnel needs and hiring 17    staff as required to perform its duties under this Act; 18    all procurement must follow State policy and procedures;19        (11) co-convene quarterly roundtable meetings with the 20    Illinois Latino Commission, the Illinois African American 21    Family Commission, and the Lieutenant Governor's Office to 22    identify opportunities for collaboration and alignment;23        (12) hold at least 2 public hearings annually to 24    assist in the development of recommendations for the 25    Governor, the General Assembly, State courts, and other 26    State entities and constitutional officers;  HB3591- 22 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (13) apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 2    allocate, disburse, and spend grants funds that are made 3    available to the Commission; and 4        (14) exercise such other powers as are necessary or 5    incidental to the administration of this Act or the 6    performance of duties under this Act.7The purpose of the Asian American Family Commission is to 8advise the Governor and General Assembly, as well as work 9directly with State agencies, to improve and expand existing 10policies, services, programs, and opportunities for Asian 11American families. The Asian American Family Commission shall 12guide the efforts of and collaborate with State agencies, 13including: the Department on Aging, the Department of Children 14and Family Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity, the Department of Corrections, the Department of 16Human Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family 17Services, the Department of Public Health, the Department of 18Transportation, the Department of Employment Security, and 19others. This shall be achieved primarily by:20        (1) monitoring and commenting on existing and proposed 21    legislation and programs designed to address the needs of 22    Asian Americans in Illinois; 23        (2) assisting State agencies in developing programs, 24    services, public policies, and research strategies that 25    will expand and enhance the social and economic well-being 26    of Asian American children and families;   HB3591- 23 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (3) facilitating the participation of and 2    representation of Asian Americans in the development, 3    implementation, and planning of policies, programs, and 4    services; and 5        (4) promoting research efforts to document the impact 6    of policies and programs on Asian American families. 7    The work of the Asian American Family Commission shall 8include the use of existing reports, research and planning 9efforts, procedures, and programs. 10(Source: P.A. 101-392, eff. 1-1-20.) 11    (20 ILCS 3916/10)12    Sec. 10. Appointment; terms. Asian American Family 13Commission. 14    The Asian American Family Commission shall be comprised of 15members appointed under this Section. As soon as practical 16after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 17General Assembly, but not later than 60 days after the 18effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19Assembly, the Governor, the President of the Senate, the 20Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 21Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 22Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 23Commission. Commission members shall elect the chairperson or 24chairpersons by a majority vote of the appointed members, and 25the chairperson or chairpersons shall each serve for a 2-year   HB3591- 24 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1term. The terms of any commissioners serving on the effective 2date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 3terminated. 4    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 5the following initial appointments: each appointing authority 6shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year term and one member to 7a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 8contrary, members may be reappointed to a 3-year term. 9    Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years 10and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 11vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 12filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 13balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 14until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall 15serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting 16from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 17compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 18expenses. 19    Appointing authorities shall ensure, to the maximum extent 20practicable, that the Commission is diverse with respect to 21age, gender, and geography to ensure the needs of Asian 22American families and children through the State are met. 23Members shall be persons with recognized ability and 24experience in one or more of the following areas: education, 25business, social services, human services, community 26development, labor, economic policy, criminal justice,   HB3591- 25 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1immigration, or health care. 2    (a) There is hereby established the Asian American Family 3Commission. 4    (b) The Asian American Family Commission shall be 5comprised of 15 members. The Governor, the President of the 6Senate, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the 7House of Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House 8of Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 9Commission. Each member shall have working knowledge of human 10services, community development, or economic public policies 11in Illinois. The Governor shall appoint the chairperson or 12chairpersons. 13    (c) Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case 14of initial appointments. Five members, as determined by lot, 15shall initially be appointed to one-year terms; 5 members 16shall be appointed to 2-year terms; and 5 members shall be 17appointed to 3-year terms, so that the terms are staggered. 18Members shall serve without compensation, but shall be 19reimbursed for Commission-related expenses.20    (d) The Department on Aging, the Department of Children 21and Family Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic 22Opportunity, the Department of Corrections, the Department of 23Employment Security, the Department of Human Services, the 24Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the Department 25of Public Health, the State Board of Education, the State 26Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community College   HB3591- 26 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Board, the Department of Human Rights, the Capital Development 2Board, the Department of Labor, and the Department of 3Transportation shall each appoint a liaison to serve ex 4officio on the Commission. The Office of the Governor, in 5cooperation with the State agencies appointing liaisons to the 6Commission under this subsection (d), shall provide 7administrative support to the Commission. 8(Source: P.A. 101-392, eff. 1-1-20.) 9    (20 ILCS 3916/12 new)10    Sec. 12. Organizational meeting. The Commission shall hold 11its organizational meeting within 60 days after at least 50% 12of the members who are to be appointed under Section 10 have 13been appointed. 14    (20 ILCS 3916/15)15    Sec. 15. Funding. The Lieutenant Governor's Office may 16receive funding through appropriations made available for use 17on behalf of the Asian American Family Commission. The 18Lieutenant Governor's Office shall expend funds set aside for 19the Commission at the Commission's direction. The Asian 20American Family Commission may receive funding through 21specific appropriations available for its purposes made to the 22Department on Aging, the Department of Children and Family 23Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 24the Department of Corrections, the Department of Human   HB3591- 27 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 2the Department of Public Health, the State Board of Education, 3the State Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community 4College Board, the Department of Human Rights, the Capital 5Development Board, the Department of Labor, and the Department 6of Transportation.7(Source: P.A. 101-392, eff. 1-1-20.) 8    (20 ILCS 3916/20)9    Sec. 20. Report. By January 1 of each year, the Asian 10American Family Commission shall submit to the Governor and 11the General Assembly a report detailing progress toward the 12goals and objectives of the Commission. The report shall 13detail, at a minimum, the Commission's work with agencies 14under the Governor, the Commission's current and ongoing 15research projects, and any legislative activity undertaken by 16the Commission. The Asian American Family Commission shall 17annually report to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the 18Commission on Equity and Inclusion on the Commission's 19progress toward its goals and objectives.20(Source: P.A. 101-392, eff. 1-1-20; 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.) 21    (20 ILCS 3916/25)22    Sec. 25. Administrative support. Oversight. 23Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 24Lieutenant Governor's Office shall, at the request of the   HB3591- 28 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Asian American Family Commission, provide administrative and 2technical support to assist the Commission in carrying out its 3duties. Administrative and technical support includes 4providing guidance on State rules and regulations pertaining 5to contracts, expenditures, and payments to ensure compliance 6with State procurement policies and processes. The Lieutenant 7Governor's Office shall provide assistance to the Asian 8American Family Commission, as requested, including access to 9office space, technology, and other supports necessary for 10effective operations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 11the contrary, the Commission on Equity and Inclusion 12established under the Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act 13shall have general oversight of the operations of the Asian 14American Family Commission.15(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    Section 20. The Illinois Latino Family Commission Act is 17amended by changing Sections 15, 20, 25, 30, and 35 and by 18adding Section 23 as follows: 19    (20 ILCS 3983/15)20    Sec. 15. Purpose and objectives. The purpose of the 21Illinois Latino Family Commission is to be an independent 22voice and represent the priorities of the Latino community and 23advocate for policies, programs, and services that promote 24greater equity and inclusion in State government. The Illinois   HB3591- 29 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Latino Family Commission works directly with the Governor, the 2General Assembly, constitutional officers, and State agencies 3to develop new and improve existing policies, services, 4programs, and opportunities for Latino families. The Illinois 5Latino Family Commission shall: 6        (1) advocate for State policies, programs, and 7    services that improve equity, inclusion, and the quality 8    of life of Latino Americans;9        (2) develop and advance recommendations to the 10    Governor, the General Assembly, State courts, and other 11    State entities and constitutional officers to reduce 12    disparities and disproportionality experienced by Latino 13    Americans;14        (3) identify priorities, goals, and objectives 15    reflecting a Latino policy agenda to guide the 16    Commission's work;17        (4) monitor the impact of and shape legislation, 18    policies, programs, and practices to ensure that they are 19    responsive to Latino Americans in Illinois;20        (5) collaborate with the Governor's Office, the 21    General Assembly, constitutional officers, State courts, 22    State agencies, and boards and commissions in developing 23    new and shaping existing programs, services, policies, and 24    initiatives to expand and enhance the social and economic 25    well-being of Latino children and families;26        (6) facilitate the participation and representation of   HB3591- 30 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    Latino Americans in the development, implementation, and 2    planning of policies, programs, and services;3        (7) engage in and promote research efforts concerning 4    Latino Americans that can inform policies, programs, and 5    services to ensure greater equity and accountability;6        (8) create and approve the annual budget and have sole 7    authority over expenditures in line with the Illinois 8    Procurement Code and the rules adopted under that Code;9        (9) hire an executive director to administer 10    operations;11        (10) make or enter into contracts with third parties 12    as necessary and convenient for the exercise of its powers 13    and duties, including defining personnel needs and hiring 14    staff as required to perform its duties under this Act; 15    all procurement must follow State policy and procedures;16        (11) co-convene quarterly roundtable meetings with the 17    Illinois African American Family Commission and the Asian 18    American Family Commission to identify opportunities for 19    collaboration and alignment;20        (12) hold at least 2 public hearings annually to 21    assist in the development of recommendations for the 22    Governor, the General Assembly, State courts, and other 23    State entities and constitutional officers;24        (13) apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 25    allocate, disburse, and spend grants funds that are made 26    available to the Commission; and   HB3591- 31 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (14) exercise such other powers as are necessary or 2    incidental to the administration of this Act or the 3    performance of duties under this Act.4The purpose of the Illinois Latino Family Commission is to 5advise the Governor and General Assembly, as well as work 6directly with State agencies to improve and expand existing 7policies, services, programs, and opportunities for Latino 8families. Subject to appropriation, the Illinois Latino Family 9Commission shall guide the efforts of and collaborate with 10State agencies, including: the Department on Aging, the 11Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 12Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Department of 13Corrections, the Department of Human Services, the Department 14of Public Aid, the Department of Public Health, the Department 15of Transportation, the Department of Employment Security, and 16others. This shall be achieved primarily by: 17        (1) monitoring and commenting on existing and proposed 18    legislation and programs designed to address the needs of 19    Latinos in Illinois; 20        (2) assisting State agencies in developing programs, 21    services, public policies, and research strategies that 22    will expand and enhance the social and economic well-being 23    of Latino children and families; 24        (3) facilitating the participation and representation 25    of Latinos in the development, implementation, and 26    planning of policies, programs, and services; and   HB3591- 32 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (4) promoting research efforts to document the impact 2    of policies and programs on Latino families. 3    The work of the Illinois Latino Family Commission shall 4include the use of existing reports, research, and planning 5efforts, procedures, and programs.6(Source: P.A. 95-619, eff. 9-14-07; 95-876, eff. 8-21-08.) 7    (20 ILCS 3983/20)8    Sec. 20. Appointment; terms. The Illinois Latino Family 9Commission shall be comprised of members appointed under this 10Section. As soon as practical after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, but not later 12than 60 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 13the 104th General Assembly, the Governor, the President of the 14Senate, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the 15House of Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House 16of Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 17Commission. Commission members shall elect the chairperson or 18chairpersons by a majority vote of the appointed members, and 19the chairperson or chairpersons shall each serve for a 2-year 20term. The terms of any commissioners serving on the effective 21date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly are 22terminated. 23    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 24the following initial appointments: each appointing authority 25shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year term and one member to   HB3591- 33 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 2contrary, members may be reappointed to a 3-year term. 3    Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years 4and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 5vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 6filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 7balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 8until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall 9serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting 10from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 11compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 12expenses. 13    Appointing authorities shall ensure, to the maximum extent 14practicable, that the Commission is diverse with respect to 15age, gender, and geography to ensure the needs of Latino 16families and children through the State are met. Members shall 17be persons with recognized ability and experience in one or 18more of the following areas: education, business, social 19services, human services, community development, labor, 20economic policy, criminal justice, immigration, or health 21care. 22The Illinois Latino Family Commission shall be comprised of 15 23members. The Governor, the President of the Senate, the 24Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 25Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 26Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the   HB3591- 34 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Commission. Each member shall have working knowledge of human 2services, community development, and economic public policies 3in Illinois. The Governor shall appoint the chairperson or 4chairpersons.5    The members shall reflect regional representation to 6ensure that the needs of Latino families and children 7throughout the State are met. The members shall be selected 8from a variety of disciplines. They shall represent a 9partnership and collaborative effort between public and 10private agencies, the business sector, and community-based 11human services organizations.12    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 13initial appointments. Five members, as determined by lot, 14shall be appointed to one-year terms; 5 members shall be 15appointed to 2-year terms; and 5 members shall be appointed to 163-year terms, so that the terms are staggered. Members shall 17serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for 18Commission-related expenses.19    The Department on Aging, the Department of Children and 20Family Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity, the Department of Corrections, the Department of 22Employment Security, the Department of Human Services, the 23Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the Department 24of Public Health, the Illinois State Board of Education, the 25Illinois State Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 26Community College Board, the Illinois Department of Human   HB3591- 35 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Rights, the Capital Development Board, the Department of 2Labor, and the Department of Transportation shall each appoint 3a liaison to serve ex-officio on the Commission. The Office of 4the Governor, in cooperation with the State agencies 5appointing liaisons to the Commission under this paragraph, 6shall provide administrative support to the Commission.7(Source: P.A. 98-32, eff. 1-1-14.) 8    (20 ILCS 3983/23 new)9    Sec. 23. Organizational meeting. The Commission shall hold 10its organizational meeting within 60 days after at least 50% 11of the members who are to be appointed under Section 20 have 12been appointed. 13    (20 ILCS 3983/25)14    Sec. 25. Funding. The Lieutenant Governor's Office may 15receive funding through appropriations made available for use 16on behalf of the Illinois Latino Family Commission. The 17Department Lieutenant Governor's Office shall expend funds set 18aside for the Commission at the Commission's direction. The 19Illinois Latino Family Commission may receive funding through 20specific appropriations available for its purposes made to the 21Department on Aging, the Department of Children and Family 22Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 23the Department of Corrections, the Department of Human 24Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services,   HB3591- 36 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1the Department of Public Health, the Illinois State Board of 2Education, the Illinois State Board of Higher Education, the 3Illinois Community College Board, the Illinois Department of 4Human Rights, the Capital Development Board, the Department of 5Labor, and the Department of Transportation. The funding 6allocation for the Commission shall be no less than $500,000.7(Source: P.A. 98-32, eff. 1-1-14.) 8    (20 ILCS 3983/30)9    Sec. 30. Administrative support. Reporting.     10    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 11Lieutenant Governor's Office shall, at the request of the 12Illinois Latino Family Commission, provide administrative and 13technical support to assist the in carrying out its duties. 14Administrative and technical support includes providing 15guidance on State rules and regulations pertaining to 16contracts, expenditures, and payments to ensure compliance 17with State procurement policies and processes. The Lieutenant 18Governor's Office shall provide assistance to the Illinois 19Latino Family Commission as requested, including access to 20office space, technology, and other supports necessary for 21effective operations. The Illinois Latino Family Commission 22shall annually report to the Governor, the General Assembly, 23and the Commission on Equity and Inclusion on the Commission's 24progress towards its goals and objectives.25(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.)   HB3591- 37 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    (20 ILCS 3983/35)2    Sec. 35. Administrative support. Oversight. 3Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 4Lieutenant Governor's Office shall, at the request of the 5Illinois Latino Family Commission, provide administrative and 6technical support to assist the in carrying out its duties. 7Administrative and technical support includes providing 8guidance on State rules and regulations pertaining to 9contracts, expenditures, and payments to ensure compliance 10with State procurement policies and processes. The Lieutenant 11Governor's Office shall provide assistance to the Illinois 12Latino Family Commission as requested, including access to 13office space, technology, and other supports necessary for 14effective operations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to 15the contrary, the Commission on Equity and Inclusion 16established under the Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act 17shall have general oversight of the operations of the Illinois 18Latino Family Commission.19(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.) 20    Section 25. The Violence Prevention Task Force Act is 21amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 22    (20 ILCS 4028/5)23    Sec. 5. Violence Prevention Task Force; members.   HB3591- 38 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    (a) There is created the Violence Prevention Task Force 2(hereinafter referred to as the Task Force) consisting of 6 3members appointed as follows:4        (1) one member of the Senate appointed by the 5    President of the Senate;6        (2) one member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 7    Leader of the Senate;8        (3) one member of the House of Representatives 9    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 10        (4) one member of the House of Representatives 11    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 12    Representatives; and13        (5) 2 members appointed by the Governor, one of whom 14    shall be designated the chairperson by the Governor.15    (b) The members of the Task Force shall serve without 16compensation but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and 17necessary expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose.18    (c) The Task Force may employ skilled experts with the 19approval of the chairperson, and shall receive the cooperation 20of those State agencies it deems appropriate to assist the 21Task Force in carrying out its duties.22    (d) The Illinois African American African-American Family 23Commission, the Illinois Department of Public Health, and the 24Illinois Latino Family Commission shall provide administrative 25and other support to the Task Force.26(Source: P.A. 98-194, eff. 8-7-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.)   HB3591- 39 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    Section 30. The Commission on Children and Youth Act is 2amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 3    (20 ILCS 4075/15)4    Sec. 15. Commission members; appointments. The Commission 5shall be composed of the following members, to be appointed 6within 60 days after the effective date of this Act: 7    (a) Four members of the General Assembly: 2 members of the 8Illinois Senate, one member appointed by the President of the 9Senate and one member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; 102 members of the Illinois House of Representatives, one member 11appointed by the Speaker of the House and one member appointed 12by the House Minority Leader.13    (b) A member of the Governor's leadership team appointed 14by the Governor, who shall serve as one of the co-chairs of the 15Commission. 16    (c) Up to 30 public members appointed by the Governor with 17demonstrated interest and expertise in children and youth 18across the major stages of child and adolescent development. 19Public members shall include rural, suburban and urban 20entities; direct service providers; child advocates; human 21rights organizations; faith-based service providers; 22philanthropic organizations that invest in children and youth; 23at least 3 parents of children under the age of 16; and at 24least 3 young people between the ages of 16 and 24. A second   HB3591- 40 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1co-chair of the Commission shall be elected from among the 2public members of the Commission by the public members. 3    (d) The following shall serve as ex-officio members of the 4Commission: the Director of Children and Family Services or 5his or her designee; the Director of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity or his or her designee; the Director of 7Corrections or his or her designee; the Director of Employment 8Security or his or her designee; the Director of Healthcare 9and Family Services or his or her designee; the Secretary of 10Human Services or his or her designee; the Director of 11Juvenile Justice or his or her designee; the Director of 12Public Health or his or her designee; the State Superintendent 13of Education or his or her designee; the Commissioner of the 14Chicago Department of Children and Youth Services or his or 15her designee; the Executive Director of the Illinois Violence 16Prevention Authority or his or her designee; the Chair of the 17Illinois African American African-American Family Commission 18or his or her designee; and the Chair of the Illinois Latino 19Family Commission or his or her designee. In addition, there 20shall be a representative of a local government entity 21coordinating services for children and youth and a 22representative of the Illinois Early Learning Council, to be 23chosen by the chairs.24(Source: P.A. 95-781, eff. 8-5-08.) 25    Section 35. The Commission to Study Disproportionate   HB3591- 41 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1Justice Impact Act is amended by changing Section 10 as 2follows: 3    (20 ILCS 4085/10)4    Sec. 10. Composition. The Commission shall be composed of 5the following members:6        (a) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 7    President, one of whom the President shall designate to 8    serve as co-chair, and two members of the Senate appointed 9    by the Minority Leader of the Senate.10        (b) Two members of the House of Representatives 11    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 12    one of whom the Speaker shall designate to serve as 13    co-chair, and two members of the House of Representatives 14    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 15    Representatives.16        (c) The following persons or their designees:17            (1) the Attorney General,18            (2) the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court of Cook 19        County,20            (3) the Director of the Illinois State Police,21            (4) the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 22        Department,23            (5) the sheriff of Cook County,24            (6) the State Appellate Defender,25            (7) the Cook County Public Defender,  HB3591- 42 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1            (8) the Director of the Office of the State's 2        Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor,3            (9) the Cook County State's Attorney,4            (10) the Executive Director of the Criminal 5        Justice Information Authority,6            (11) the Director of Corrections, 7            (12) the Director of Juvenile Justice, and8            (13) the Executive Director of the Illinois 9        African American African-American Family Commission. 10        (d) The co-chairs may name up to 8 persons, 11    representing minority communities within Illinois, groups 12    involved in the improvement of the administration of 13    justice, behavioral health, criminal justice, law 14    enforcement, and the rehabilitation of former inmates, 15    community groups, and other interested parties. 16(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 17    Section 40. The Advisory Commission on Reducing the 18Disproportionate Representation of African-American Children 19in Foster Care Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 4104/5)21    Sec. 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds the 22following:23        (1) In 1994 the Illinois African American 24    African-American Family Commission was created by   HB3591- 43 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    Executive Order to assist the Department of Children and 2    Family Services in developing and implementing programs 3    and public policies that affect the State's child welfare 4    system.5        (2) However, in 2004 the Commission was renamed and 6    its role expanded to focus on the development of services 7    and programs that aim to strengthen and preserve the 8    social and economic well-being of African-American 9    families.10        (3) This holistic approach to strengthening 11    African-American families and communities, though 12    necessary, has yet to adequately address the 13    disproportionate number of African-American children in 14    foster care. 15        (4) According to a 2017 fact sheet published by Child 16    Trends, in 2015 African-American children represented 50% 17    of Illinois' foster care population even though they only 18    make up 15% of the State's general child population. 19        (5) In contrast, white children represented 38% of the 20    foster care population in 2015 even though they make up 21    52% of the State's general child population. 22        (6) Hispanic children are underrepresented in 23    Illinois' foster care system as they only accounted for 9% 24    of the foster care population in 2015 despite making up 25    24% of the general child population. 26        (7) Unfortunately, the disproportionate number of   HB3591- 44 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    African-American children in foster care is a national 2    dilemma. 3        (8) According to an April 13, 2020 report published by 4    the Annie E. Casey Foundation's KIDS COUNT Data Center, 5    even though "the share of children who are black and in 6    foster care remains much smaller than it was nearly a 7    decade ago . . . black children are still overrepresented 8    among youth in foster care relative to the general 9    population" as they account for 23% of all kids in foster 10    care even though they only represent 14% of the total 11    child population in the United States. 12        (9) In light of these grim statistics, the General 13    Assembly finds the need for a separate advisory commission 14    that is exclusively focused on identifying those causes 15    and factors that contribute to the overrepresentation of 16    African-American children in Illinois' foster care system 17    and the policy measures needed to safely reduce the number 18    of African-American children in foster care and keep them 19    with their families.20(Source: P.A. 102-470, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    Section 45. The Commission to End Hunger Act is amended by 22changing Section 15 as follows: 23    (20 ILCS 5015/15)24    Sec. 15. Members. The Commission to End Hunger shall be   HB3591- 45 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1composed of no more than 21 voting members including 2 members 2of the Illinois House of Representatives, one appointed by the 3Speaker of the House and one appointed by the House Minority 4Leader; 2 members of the Illinois Senate, one appointed by the 5Senate President and one appointed by the Senate Minority 6Leader; one representative of the Office of the Governor 7appointed by the Governor; one representative of the Office of 8the Lieutenant Governor appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; 9and 15 public members, who shall be appointed by the Governor. 10    The public members shall include 2 representatives of food 11banks; 2 representatives from other community food assistance 12programs; a representative of a statewide organization focused 13on responding to hunger; a representative from an anti-poverty 14organization; a representative of an organization that serves 15or advocates for children and youth; a representative of an 16organization that serves or advocates for older adults; a 17representative of an organization that advocates for people 18who are homeless; a representative of an organization that 19serves or advocates for persons with disabilities; a 20representative of an organization that advocates for 21immigrants; a representative of a municipal or county 22government; and 3 at-large members. The appointed members 23shall reflect the racial, gender, and geographic diversity of 24the State and shall include representation from regions of the 25State.26    The following officials shall serve as ex-officio members:   HB3591- 46 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1the Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee; the 2State Superintendent of Education or his or her designee; the 3Director of Healthcare and Family Services or his or her 4designee; the Director of Children and Family Services or his 5or her designee; the Director of Aging or his or her designee; 6the Director of Natural Resources or his or her designee; and 7the Director of Agriculture or his or her designee. The 8Illinois African American African-American Family Commission 9and the Illinois Latino Family Commission shall each designate 10a liaison to serve ex-officio on the Commission. 11    Members shall serve without compensation and are 12responsible for the cost of all reasonable and necessary 13travel expenses connected to Commission business, as the State 14of Illinois will not reimburse Commission members for these 15costs. 16    Commission members shall be appointed within 60 days after 17the effective date of this Act. The Commission shall hold 18their initial meetings within 60 days after at least 50% of the 19members have been appointed. 20    The representative of the Office of the Governor and a 21representative of a food bank shall serve as co-chairs of the 22Commission. 23    At the first meeting of the Commission, the members shall 24select a 5-person Steering Committee that includes the 25co-chairs. 26    The Commission may establish committees that address   HB3591- 47 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1specific issues or populations and may appoint individuals 2with relevant expertise who are not appointed members of the 3Commission to serve on committees as needed.4    The Office of the Governor, or a designee of the 5Governor's choosing, shall provide guidance to the Commission. 6Under the leadership of the Office of the Governor, subject to 7appropriation, the Department of Human Services shall also 8provide leadership to support the Commission. The Department 9of Human Services and the State of Illinois shall not incur any 10costs as a result of the creation of the Commission to End 11Hunger as the coordination of meetings, report preparation, 12and other related duties will be completed by a representative 13of a food bank that is serving as a co-chair of the Commission.14(Source: P.A. 102-1119, eff. 1-23-23.) 15    Section 50. The Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task 16Force Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 17    (20 ILCS 5025/10)18    Sec. 10. Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task Force. 19There is created the Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task 20Force, composed of the following members:21        (1) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 22    President, one of whom the President shall designate to 23    serve as co-chair, and 2 members of the Senate appointed 24    by the Minority Leader of the Senate.  HB3591- 48 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (2) Two members of the House of Representatives 2    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 3    one of whom the Speaker shall designate to serve as 4    co-chair, and 2 members of the House of Representatives 5    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 6    Representatives.7        (3) The following persons or their designees:8            (A) the Attorney General,9            (B) the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court of Cook 10        County,11            (C) the Director of the Illinois State Police,12            (D) the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 13        Department,14            (E) the Sheriff of Cook County,15            (F) the State Appellate Defender,16            (G) the Cook County Public Defender,17            (H) the Director of the Office of the State's 18        Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor,19            (I) the Cook County State's Attorney,20            (J) the Executive Director of the Illinois 21        Criminal Justice Information Authority,22            (K) the Director of Corrections,23            (L) the Director of Juvenile Justice, and24            (M) the Executive Director of the Illinois African 25        American African-American Family Commission.26        (4) The co-chairs may name up to 8 persons,   HB3591- 49 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    representing minority communities within Illinois, groups 2    involved in the improvement of the administration of 3    justice, behavioral health, criminal justice, law 4    enforcement, and the rehabilitation of former inmates, 5    community groups, and other interested parties. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    Section 55. The Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act is 8amended by changing Section 40-10 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 574/40-10)10    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-961)11    Sec. 40-10. Powers and duties. In addition to the other 12powers and duties which may be prescribed in this Act or 13elsewhere, the Commission shall have the following powers and 14duties: 15        (1) The Commission shall have a role in all State and 16    university procurement by facilitating and streamlining 17    communications between the Business Enterprise Council for 18    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, the 19    purchasing entities, the Chief Procurement Officers, and 20    others. 21        (2) The Commission may create a scoring evaluation for 22    State agency directors, public university presidents and 23    chancellors, and public community college presidents. The 24    scoring shall be based on the following 3 principles: (i)   HB3591- 50 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    increasing capacity; (ii) growing revenue; and (iii) 2    enhancing credentials. These principles should be the 3    foundation of the agency compliance plan required under 4    Section 6 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 5    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.6        (3) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 7    duties provided to it under Section 5-7 of the Illinois 8    Procurement Code. 9        (4) The Commission, working with State agencies, shall 10    provide support for diversity in State hiring. 11        (5) The Commission shall supervise the implementation 12    and effectiveness of supplier diversity training of the 13    State procurement workforce. 14        (6) Each January, and as otherwise frequently as may 15    be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Commission, the 16    Commission shall propose and submit to the Governor and 17    the General Assembly legislative changes to increase 18    inclusion and diversity in State government. 19        (7) The Commission shall have oversight over the 20    following entities: 21            (A) the Illinois African American African-American 22        Family Commission; 23            (B) the Illinois Latino Family Commission; 24            (C) the Asian American Family Commission; 25            (D) the Illinois Muslim American Advisory Council; 26            (E) the Illinois African-American Fair Contracting   HB3591- 51 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        Commission created under Executive Order 2018-07; and 2            (F) the Business Enterprise Council for 3        Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities. 4        (8) The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary for 5    the implementation and administration of the requirements 6    of this Act. 7        (9) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 8    duties provided to it under Section 45-57 of the Illinois 9    Procurement Code. 10        (10) The Commission is responsible for completing 11    studies as required by Section 35-15 of the Illinois 12    Community Reinvestment Act. 13(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 14103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 103-959, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-961)16    Sec. 40-10. Powers and duties. In addition to the other 17powers and duties which may be prescribed in this Act or 18elsewhere, the Commission shall have the following powers and 19duties: 20        (1) The Commission shall have a role in all State and 21    university procurement by facilitating and streamlining 22    communications between the Business Enterprise Council for 23    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, the 24    purchasing entities, the Chief Procurement Officers, and 25    others.   HB3591- 52 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        (2) The Commission may create a scoring evaluation for 2    State agency directors, public university presidents and 3    chancellors, and public community college presidents. The 4    scoring shall be based on the following 3 principles: (i) 5    increasing capacity; (ii) growing revenue; and (iii) 6    enhancing credentials. These principles should be the 7    foundation of the agency compliance plan required under 8    Section 6 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 9    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.10        (3) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 11    duties provided to it under Section 5-7 of the Illinois 12    Procurement Code. 13        (4) The Commission, working with State agencies, shall 14    provide support for diversity in State hiring. 15        (5) The Commission shall supervise the implementation 16    and effectiveness of supplier diversity training of the 17    State procurement workforce. 18        (6) Each January, and as otherwise frequently as may 19    be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Commission, the 20    Commission shall propose and submit to the Governor and 21    the General Assembly legislative changes to increase 22    inclusion and diversity in State government. 23        (7) The Commission shall have oversight over the 24    following entities: 25            (A) the Illinois African American African-American 26        Family Commission;   HB3591- 53 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1            (B) the Illinois Latino Family Commission; 2            (C) the Asian American Family Commission; 3            (D) the Illinois Muslim American Advisory Council; 4            (E) the Illinois African-American Fair Contracting 5        Commission created under Executive Order 2018-07; and 6            (F) the Business Enterprise Council for 7        Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities. 8        (7.5) The Commission shall have oversight over the 9    collection of supplier diversity reports by State agencies 10    to the extent that those agencies are required to collect 11    supplier diversity reports. This oversight shall include 12    publishing, on the Commission's website, a copy of each 13    such supplier diversity report submitted to a State agency 14    and may include conducting an annual hearing with each 15    State agency to discuss ongoing compliance with supplier 16    diversity reporting requirements. The Commission is not 17    responsible for ensuring compliance by the filers of 18    supplier diversity reports to their respective agencies. 19    The agencies subject to oversight by the Commission and 20    the relevant voluntary supplier diversity reports include 21    the following:22            (A) the Health Facilities and Services Review 23        Board for hospitals; 24            (B) the Department of Commerce and Economic 25        Opportunity for tax credit recipients under the 26        Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit   HB3591- 54 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1        Act; 2            (C) the Illinois Commerce Commission for utilities 3        and railroads; 4            (D) the Illinois Gaming Board for casinos; and 5            (E) the Illinois Racing Board for race tracks. 6        (7.6) The Commission may hold public workshops focused 7    on specific industries and reports to collaboratively 8    connect diverse enterprises with entities that manage 9    supplier diversity programs. These workshops may be 10    modeled after Illinois Commerce Commission hearings for 11    utilities and railroads that include a collaborative 12    discussion of filed supplier diversity reports. 13        (8) The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary for 14    the implementation and administration of the requirements 15    of this Act. 16        (9) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 17    duties provided to it under Section 45-57 of the Illinois 18    Procurement Code. 19        (10) The Commission is responsible for completing 20    studies as required by Section 35-15 of the Illinois 21    Community Reinvestment Act. 22(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 23103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 103-959, eff. 1-1-25; 103-961, eff. 247-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   HB3591- 55 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.  HB3591- 56 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 3903/14    20 ILCS 3903/55    20 ILCS 3903/106    20 ILCS 3903/157    20 ILCS 3903/208    20 ILCS 3903/23 new9    20 ILCS 3903/2510    20 ILCS 3903/3011    20 ILCS 3903/3512    20 ILCS 3916/513    20 ILCS 3916/1014    20 ILCS 3916/12 new15    20 ILCS 3916/1516    20 ILCS 3916/2017    20 ILCS 3916/2518    20 ILCS 3983/1519    20 ILCS 3983/2020    20 ILCS 3983/23 new21    20 ILCS 3983/2522    20 ILCS 3983/3023    20 ILCS 3983/3524    20 ILCS 4028/525    20 ILCS 4075/15  HB3591- 57 -LRB104 12174 SPS 22276 b1    20 ILCS 4085/102    20 ILCS 4104/53    20 ILCS 5015/154    20 ILCS 5025/105    30 ILCS 574/40-10